Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5991XS (2) 91 sb/js S.F. 2153 Section 1. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraph a, 1 subparagraphs (1) and (4), Code 2026, are amended to read as 2 follows: 3 (1) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons when 4 the personâs employment in a private investigation business 5 or private security business licensed under chapter 80A , or 6 a personâs employment as a member of the general assembly, 7 peace officer, correctional officer, county attorney, assistant 8 county attorney, security guard, bank messenger or other person 9 transporting property of a value requiring security, or in 10 police work, reasonably justifies that person going armed. 11 (4) A person may be issued a permit to carry weapons if the 12 person is a member of the general assembly, county attorney , 13 or an assistant county attorney. An application for a permit 14 by an assistant county attorney must be approved by the county 15 attorney of each county in which the applicant serves prior to 16 a permit to carry weapons being issued. An application for a 17 permit by a member of the general assembly shall be submitted 18 to the sheriff for the county in which the applicant resides. 19 The sheriff of the issuing county may require the applicant 20 to complete a proficiency examination prior to issuing the 21 permit to carry weapons. The standards for a proficiency 22 examination for a member of the general assembly, county 23 attorney , or assistant county attorney shall not exceed the 24 standards required of a peace officer. The applicant shall pay 25 the reasonable costs associated with completing a proficiency 26 examination. 27 Sec. 2. Section 724.6, subsection 1, paragraphs b, c, and d, 28 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 29 b. The permit shall be on a form prescribed and published by 30 the commissioner of public safety, shall identify the holder, 31 and shall state the nature of the employment requiring the 32 holder to go armed. A permit so issued, other than to a member 33 of the general assembly, peace officer, county attorney, or 34 assistant county attorney, shall authorize the person to whom 35 -1- LSB 5991XS (2) 91 sb/js 1/ 3 S.F. 2153 it is issued to go armed anywhere in the state, only while 1 engaged in the employment, and while going to and from the 2 place of the employment. 3 c. A permit issued to a member of the general assembly, 4 certified peace officer, county attorney, or assistant county 5 attorney shall authorize that member of the general assembly, 6 peace officer, county attorney, or assistant county attorney to 7 go armed anywhere in the state at all times, including on the 8 grounds of a school. 9 d. Permits shall expire twelve months after the date when 10 issued except that permits issued to members of the general 11 assembly, peace officers, county attorneys, assistant county 12 attorneys, and correctional officers are valid through the 13 holder of the permitâs period of employment unless otherwise 14 canceled. When the employment is terminated, the holder of the 15 permit shall surrender it the permit to the issuing officer for 16 cancellation. 17